Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.180

Flags to be displayed.

The flag of the United States and the flag of the state shall be prominently installed and displayed and maintained in code city buildings and shall be as provided in RCW 1.20.010.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.180.]